Hawaii statutes.
§6K-6 Responsibilities and duties of the
commission. The general administration of the island
reserve shall rest with the commission. In carrying out its duties and
responsibilities, the commission:

(1) Shall establish criteria, policies, and controls
for permissible uses within the island reserve;

(2) Shall approve all contracts for services and
rules pertaining to the island reserve;

(3) Shall provide advice to the governor, the
department, and other departments and agencies on any matter relating to the
island reserve;

(4) Shall provide advice to the office of planning
and the department of the attorney general on any matter relating to the
federal conveyance of Kaho‘olawe;

(5) May enter into curator or stewardship agreements
with appropriate Hawaiian cultural and spiritual community organizations for
the perpetuation of native Hawaiian cultural, religious, and subsistence
customs, beliefs, and practices for the purposes stated in section 6K-3;

(6) Shall carry out those powers and duties otherwise
conferred upon the board of land and natural resources and the land use
commission with regard to dispositions and approvals pertaining to the island
reserve. All powers and duties of the board of land and natural resources and
the land use commission concerning dispositions and approvals pertaining to the
island reserve are transferred to the commission;

(7) Shall carry out those powers and duties
concerning the island reserve otherwise conferred upon the county of Maui by
chapter 205A. The powers and duties of the county of Maui and its agencies
concerning coastal zone dispositions and approvals pertaining to the island
reserve are transferred to the commission;

(8) Shall carry out those powers and duties
concerning the island reserve otherwise conferred upon the island burial
councils and the department with regard to proper treatment of burial sites and
human skeletal remains found in the island reserve;

(9) Shall adopt rules in accordance with chapter 91
that are necessary for the purposes of this chapter and shall maintain a record
of its proceedings and actions;

(10) May delegate to the executive director or
employees of the commission, by formal commission action, such power and
authority vested in the commission by this chapter as the commission deems
reasonable and proper for the effective administration of this chapter; and

(11) May solicit and accept grants, donations, and
contributions for deposit into the Kaho‘olawe rehabilitation trust fund to
support the purposes of this chapter. [L 1993, c 340, pt of §2;
am L 1994, c 161, §5; am L 1996, c 299, §3; am L 1997, c 205, §1; am L 2001, c
126, §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next